Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 170. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS AFFECTING COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

Sec. 170.001. REGULATION OF CERTAIN USE OF PRIVATELY OWNED VEHICLES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may adopt rules prohibiting or regulating the use of a privately owned motor vehicle for the performance of county business or law enforcement duties by a sheriff or constable or a deputy of a sheriff or constable.

(b) This section does not authorize a commissioners court to adopt rules relating to the private use of a privately owned motor vehicle.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Redesignated from Local Government Code Sec. 240.096 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.001.

Sec. 170.002. CODE OF ETHICS FOR CERTAIN COMMISSIONERS COURTS. (a) This section applies to a county that has a population of less than 50,000 that is adjacent to a county with a population of more than 3.3 million.

(b) The commissioners court of a county subject to this section may adopt by order a code of ethics that provides standards of conduct for members of the commissioners court.

(c) If a commissioners court of a county subject to this section adopts a code of ethics under this section, the code of ethics must require each member of the commissioners court to file a conflicts disclosure statement that is in addition to the statement required by Section 176.003.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1070 (H.B. 1495), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 138, eff. September 1, 2023.